Illinois, session 104th, SB2351.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Auction License Act is amended by changing 5Sections 5-10 and 10-1 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 407/5-10)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2030)8    Sec. 5-10. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    "Advertisement" means any written, oral, or electronic 10communication that contains a promotion, inducement, or offer 11to conduct an auction or offer to provide an auction service, 12including but not limited to brochures, pamphlets, radio and 13television scripts, telephone and direct mail solicitations, 14electronic media, Internet online, and other means of 15promotion.16    "Advisory Board" or "Board" means the Auctioneer Advisory 17Board.18    "Auction" means the sale or lease of property, real or 19personal, by means of exchanges between an auctioneer and 20prospective purchasers or lessees, which consists of a series 21of invitations or bids for offers made by the auctioneer to and 22offers by prospective purchasers or lessees for the purpose of 23obtaining an acceptable offer for the sale or lease of the   SB2351 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 05051 AAS 15079 b1property, including the sale or lease of property via mail, 2telecommunications, or the Internet online.3    "Auction contract" means a written agreement between an 4auctioneer or auction firm and a seller or sellers.5    "Auction firm" means any corporation, partnership, or 6limited liability company that acts as an auctioneer and 7provides an auction service.8    "Auction school" means any educational institution, public 9or private, that offers a curriculum of auctioneer education 10and training approved by the Department.11    "Auction service" means the service of arranging, 12managing, advertising, or conducting auctions.13    "Auctioneer" means a person or entity who, for another, 14for a fee, compensation, commission, or any other valuable 15consideration at auction or with the intention or expectation 16of receiving valuable consideration by the means of or process 17of an auction or sale at auction or providing an auction 18service, offers, negotiates, or attempts to negotiate an 19auction contract, sale, purchase, or exchange of goods, 20chattels, merchandise, personal property, real property, or 21any commodity that may be lawfully kept or offered for sale by 22or at auction.23    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 24by the Department in the applicant's or licensee's application 25file or license file maintained by the Department. 26    "Buyer premium" means any fee or compensation paid by the   SB2351 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 05051 AAS 15079 b1successful purchaser of property sold or leased at or by 2auction, to the auctioneer, auction firms, seller, lessor, or 3other party to the transaction, other than the purchase price. 4    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 5Professional Regulation. 6    "Division" means the Division of Real Estate within the 7Department. 8    "Email address of record" means the designated email 9address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 10application file or the licensee's license file maintained by 11the Department's licensure maintenance unit. 12    "Estate sale" means a sale for liquidation of personal 13property of an estate owned by one or more individuals, 14families, or legal representatives of the estate that is 15advertised and scheduled for a predetermined amount of time 16and to which the public is invited to participate in a 17negotiation or bid for the purchase of the personal property.18    "Estate sale service" means the performance of an auction 19service for the owners of personal property to be sold at an 20estate sale, where an auctioneer undertakes the responsibility 21of conducting the sale. "Estate sale service" does not include 22the sale of real property. 23    "Goods" means chattels, movable goods, merchandise, or 24personal property or commodities of any form or type that may 25be lawfully kept or offered for sale.26    "Interactive computer service" means any information   SB2351 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 05051 AAS 15079 b1service, system, or access software provider that provides or 2enables computer access by multiple users to a computer 3server, including specifically a service or system that 4provides access to the Internet. 5    "Internet auction listing service" means a website on the 6Internet, or other interactive computer service, that is 7designed to allow or advertise as a means of allowing users to 8offer personal property or services for sale or lease to a 9prospective buyer or lessee through an online bid submission 10process using that website or interactive computer service and 11that does not examine, set the price, prepare the description 12of the personal property or service to be offered, or in any 13way utilize the services of a natural person as an auctioneer.14    "Licensee" means any person licensed under this Act.15    "Managing auctioneer" means any person licensed as an 16auctioneer who manages and supervises licensees.17    "Online auction" means an auction or auction service 18conducted by an auctioneer via a website on the Internet, an 19application, an interactive computer service, or other similar 20media. 21    "Person" means an individual, association, partnership, 22corporation, or limited liability company or the officers, 23directors, or employees of the same.24    "Pre-renewal period" means the 24 months prior to the 25expiration date of a license issued under this Act.26    "Real estate" means real estate as defined in Section 1-10   SB2351 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 05051 AAS 15079 b1of the Real Estate License Act of 2000 or its successor Acts. 2    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 3Professional Regulation or his or her designee. 4(Source: P.A. 100-534, eff. 9-22-17; 101-345, eff. 8-9-19.) 5    (225 ILCS 407/10-1)6    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2030)7    Sec. 10-1. Necessity of license; exemptions. 8    (a) It is unlawful for any person, corporation, limited 9liability company, partnership, or other entity to conduct an 10auction, provide an auction service, hold himself or herself 11out as an auctioneer, or advertise his or her services as an 12auctioneer in the State of Illinois without a license issued 13by the Department under this Act, except at:14        (1) an auction conducted solely by or for a 15    not-for-profit organization for charitable purposes in 16    which the individual receives no compensation;17        (2) an auction conducted by the owner of the property, 18    real or personal;19        (3) an auction for the sale or lease of real property 20    conducted by a licensee under the Real Estate License Act, 21    or its successor Acts, in accordance with the terms of 22    that Act;23        (4) an auction conducted by a business registered as a 24    market agency under the federal Packers and Stockyards Act 25    (7 U.S.C. 181 et seq.) or under the Livestock Auction   SB2351 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 05051 AAS 15079 b1    Market Law;2        (5) an auction conducted by an agent, officer, or 3    employee of a federal agency in the conduct of his or her 4    official duties; and5        (6) an auction conducted by an agent, officer, or 6    employee of the State government or any political 7    subdivision thereof performing his or her official duties.8    (b) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to apply to a 9new or used vehicle dealer or a vehicle auctioneer licensed by 10the Secretary of State of Illinois, or to any employee of the 11licensee, who is a resident of the State of Illinois, while the 12employee is acting in the regular scope of his or her 13employment for the licensee while conducting an auction that 14is not open to the public, provided that only new or used 15vehicle dealers, rebuilders, automotive parts recyclers, or 16scrap processors licensed by the Secretary of State or 17licensed by another state or jurisdiction may buy property at 18the auction, or to sales by or through the licensee. 19Out-of-state salvage vehicle buyers licensed in another state 20or jurisdiction may also buy property at the auction.21    (c) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prohibit a 22person under the age of 18 from selling property under $250 in 23value while under the direct supervision of a licensed 24auctioneer.25    (d) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to apply to a 26person providing an Internet auction listing service as   SB2351 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 05051 AAS 15079 b1defined in Section 5-10.2    (e) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to apply to a 3third-party reseller of personal property where owners or 4representatives of an estate have transferred ownership of the 5property to the reseller to be sold anonymously. A third-party 6reseller may include, but is not limited to, a retail seller, a 7consignment seller, or a distributor who does not conduct an 8estate sale.9    (f) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to apply to 10any person as a receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, guardian, 11administrator, or executor; any such person acting under an 12order of any court, under the direction of any public 13authority, or pursuant to any judicial decree; or any such 14person acting pursuant to a trust agreement, deed of trust, or 15will. 16(Source: P.A. 100-534, eff. 9-22-17.)